Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Operation of Offices.

Sec. 06.26.150.
Trust company home office.

A trust company shall continuously maintain in this state a home office where the trust company operates and keeps its records. At least one executive officer shall maintain an office at the home office.

Each executive officer at the home office is an agent of the trust company for service of process.

A trust company may change its home office to any of its offices existing at the time of the change within this state by filing a written notice with the department setting out the name of the trust company, the street address of its home office before the change, the street address to which the home office is to be changed, and a copy of a resolution adopted by the trust company’s board authorizing the change.

The change of the location of a home office takes effect on the 61st day after the date the department receives the notice under (c) of this section, unless the department establishes a different date or unless, before the 61st day, the department notifies the trust company that the trust company shall establish to the satisfaction of the department that the relocation is consistent with the original determination made under AS

06.26.090

for the establishment of a trust company at that location, in which event the change of home office takes effect when approved by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For governance, see 3 AAC 4, art. 5.

Sec. 06.26.160.
Trust company branch offices.

A trust company may establish branch offices anywhere in the state by

filing a written notice with the department setting out the name of the trust company, the street address of the proposed branch office, and a description of the activities proposed to be conducted at the branch office;

filing with the department a copy of a resolution adopted by the trust company’s board authorizing the establishment or acquisition of the branch office; and

paying the filing fee established by the department by regulation.

The department has 60 days from the date the department receives the notice under (a) of this section to review the proposal for the branch office, and the trust company may begin operating the branch office on the 61st day after the date the department receives the notice, unless the department specifies a different date.

The department may extend the 60-day period of review provided by (b) of this section if the department determines that the proposed branch office raises issues that require additional information or if the department needs additional time for analysis. If the 60-day period of review is extended, the trust company may establish the branch office only after the department approves the branch office in writing. The department may deny the trust company permission to establish a branch office if the department has safety or soundness concerns.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.170.
Trust company representative offices.

A trust company may establish or acquire representative trust offices anywhere in this state. To establish or acquire a representative office, a trust company shall

file a written notice with the department that sets out the name of the trust company and the location of the proposed representative office;

file with the department a copy of a resolution adopted by the trust company’s board authorizing the establishment or acquisition of the representative office; and

pay the filing fee established by the department by regulation.

The department has 60 days from the date the department receives the notice filed under (a) of this section to review the establishment or acquisition of a representative office, and the trust company may begin operating the representative office on the 61st day after the date the department receives the notice, unless the department specifies a different date.

The department may extend the 60-day period of review provided by (b) of this section if the department determines that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or if the department needs additional time for analysis. If the 60-day period of review is extended, the trust company may establish the representative office only after the department approves the office in writing. The department may deny permission to establish or acquire a representative office of the trust company if the department has safety or soundness concerns.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.180.
Offices outside the state.

With the prior written approval of the department, a trust company may establish a branch office or a representative office outside this state. To establish a branch office or representative office outside this state, a trust company shall

submit an application to the department specifying the location of the proposed office, the business to be conducted at the proposed office, and the laws of the jurisdiction where the office will be located that permit the office to be established;

file with the department a copy of a resolution adopted by the trust company’s board authorizing the establishment or acquisition of the office; and

pay the filing fee established by the department by regulation.

The department may approve an application under (a) of this section for a branch office or representative office if the department finds that

the laws of the jurisdiction in which the office is to be located permit the establishment of the office; and

the department does not have a significant supervisory or regulatory concern regarding the proposed office.

If a trust company submits with the application a certified statement of the governmental regulator for the jurisdiction in which the office is to be located expressly permitting the establishment of the office, the trust company may establish the office by following the procedures under AS

06.26.090

, except that the trust company may not establish the office before the 91st day after the date the department receives the notice filed under AS

06.26.160(a)

unless the department notifies the trust company that the trust company may establish the office on an earlier date.

The department may deny a trust company permission to establish a branch office or representative office outside this state if the department has safety or soundness concerns regarding

the market to be served;

whether the proposed organizational structure, capital structure, and amount of capitalization are adequate;

whether the anticipated volume and nature of the proposed office indicate a reasonable probability of success and profitability based on the market sought to be served;

whether, as a group, the officers, directors, and employees have sufficient fiduciary experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed office will operate in compliance with law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.190.
Hours of operation.

A trust company and an interstate state trust company or an international trust company maintaining a trust office under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

may close on the legal holidays described in AS

44.12.010

—

44.12.025

. A notice of holiday closings shall be made available to the trust company’s customers by mail, by the Internet, or by other means.

A trust company and an interstate state trust company or international trust company maintaining a trust office under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

may close on any business day if the trust company

notifies the department in advance of the closure; and

makes a closure notice available to its customers by mail, by the Internet, or by other means.

The hours of operation, and any changes in the hours of operation, of a trust company and an interstate state trust company or international trust company maintaining a trust office under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

must be submitted to the department and must be made available to the trust company’s customers by mail, by the Internet, or by other means.

Notwithstanding this section, the hours of operation of a trust company with a certificate of authority issued under AS 06.05 are subject to AS

06.05.166

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 2003)